Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1083
Creation of not-for-profit institution; authorized.

A society may create, maintain, and operate, or may establish organizations to operate, not-for-profit institutions to further the purposes permitted by subdivision (1)(b) of section 44-1076. Such institutions may furnish services free or at a reasonable charge. Any real or personal property owned, held, or leased by the society for this purpose shall be reported in every annual statement.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 12.